Utah statutes.
78A-6-1204.   Parental involvement -- Victims -- Restitution.
(1)  Every youth appearing before the Youth Court shall be accompanied by a
parent, guardian, or legal custodian.
(2)  Victims shall have the right to attend hearings and be heard.
(3)  Any restitution due a victim of an offense shall be made in full prior to
the time the case is completed by the Youth Court.  Restitution shall be
agreed upon between the youth and victim.
